North Carolina statutes. Chapter 96. Employment Security.
Article 2C. Benefits Payable for Unemployment Compensation.

§ 96-12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-2, s. 2(a), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
Ex. Sess. 1936, c. 1, s. 3; 1937, c. 448, s. 1; 1939, c. 27, ss. 1-3, 14; c. 141; 1941, c. 108, s. 1; c. 276; 1943, c. 377, ss. 1-4; 1945, c. 522, ss. 24-26; 1947, c. 326, s. 21; 1949, c. 424, ss. 19-21; 1951, c. 332, ss.
10-12; 1953, c. 401, ss. 17, 18; 1957, c. 1059, ss. 12, 13; c. 1339; 1959, c. 362, ss. 12-15; 1961, c. 454, ss. 17, 18; 1965, c. 795, ss. 15, 16; 1969, c. 575, s. 9; 1971, c. 673, ss. 25, 26; 1973, c. 1138, ss. 3-7; 1975, c. 2, ss.
1-5; 1977, c. 727, s. 52; 1979, c. 660, ss. 18, 19; 1981, c. 160, ss. 17-23; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1178, ss. 3-14; 1983, c. 585, ss. 12-16; c. 625, ss. 1, 7; 1985, c. 552, s. 9; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 918; 1987, c. 17, s.
8; 1993, c. 122, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 680, ss. 1-3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 646, s. 25(a); 1997-456, s. 27; 1999-340, s. 11; 2001-414, s. 41; 2011-401, s. 2.11; repealed by 2013-2, s. 2(a), effective July 1, 2013.

§ 96-12.01.

Recodified as

G.S. 96-14.14

by Session Laws 2013-2, s. 6, effective July 1, 2013.

§§ 96-12.1 through 96-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-2, s. 2(a), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
S. 96-12.1; 1991, c. 409, s. 1; 1993, c. 343, s. 6; 2011-401, s. 2.13; repealed by 2013-2, s. 2(a), effective July 1, 2013. s. 96-13: Ex. Sess. 1936, c. 1, s. 4; 1939, c. 27, ss. 4, 5; c. 141; 1941, c. 108, s. 2; 1943, c.
377, s. 5; 1945, c. 522, ss. 27-28; 1947, c. 326, s. 22; 1949, c. 424, s. 22; 1951, c. 332, s. 13; 1961, c. 454, s. 19; 1965, c. 795, ss. 17, 18; 1969, c. 575, ss. 10, 11; 1971, c. 673, ss. 27, 28; 1973, c. 172, s. 6; 1975, c. 2, s.
6; c. 8, ss. 1, 2; c. 226, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 727, s. 53; 1979, c. 660, ss. 20, 21, 29-31; 1981, c. 160, ss. 24, 25; c. 883; 1983, c. 585, s. 17; c. 625, ss. 2-5; 1985, c. 53; c. 197, ss. 4, 5; c. 552, ss. 10, 11; c. 616, s. 2; 1989,
c. 707, s. 3; c. 770, s. 22; 1991, c. 423, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 680, s. 5; 1995, c. 270, s. 1; c. 284, s. 1; 1997-398, s. 5; 1997-456, s.27; 1999-463, Ex. Sess., s. 7; 2003-1, s. 1; 2003-220, s. 5; 2005-410, s. 1; 2009-301,
s. 2; 2011-401, s. 2.14; repealed by 2013-2, s. 2(a), effective July 1, 2013. s. 96-14: Ex. Sess. 1936, c. 1, s. 5; 1937, c. 448, ss. 2, 3; 1939, c. 52, s. 1; 1941, c. 108, ss. 3, 4; 1943, c. 377, ss. 7, 8; 1945, c. 522, s. 29; 1947,
c. 598, s. 10; c. 881, ss. 1, 2; 1949, c. 424, ss. 23-25; 1951, c. 332, s. 14; 1955, c. 385, ss. 7, 8; 1961, c. 454, s. 20; 1965, c. 795, s. 19; 1969, c. 575, s. 12; 1971, c. 673, s. 29; 1977, c. 26; 1981, c. 160, s. 26; c. 593; 1981
(Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1178, s. 15; 1983, c. 585, s. 18; c. 625, ss. 6, 8; 1985, c. 552, ss. 12, 14-17; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 999, ss. 4, 5; 1989, c. 583, ss. 7-10, 15; c. 666; c. 707, s. 5; 1991, c. 219, s. 1; 1993, c. 122,
s. 3; c. 343, ss. 2, 3; 1997-456, s. 27; 1998-212, s. 12.27A(p); 1999-196, s. 4; 2001-251, s. 2; 2003-220, ss. 1, 3, 6; 2009-101, ss. 2, 3; 2009-301, s. 3; 2009-506, s. 3; 2011-401, s. 2.15; 2012-134, s. 2(b); repealed by 2013-2, s.
2(a), effective July 1, 2013.

§ 96-14.1.
Unemployment benefits.

Purpose. — The purpose of this Article is to provide temporary unemployment benefits as required by federal law to an individual who is unemployed through no fault on the part of the individual and who is able, available, and actively seeking work. Benefits
are payable on the basis of service, to which section 3309(a)(1) of the Code applies, performed for a governmental entity, a nonprofit organization, and an Indian tribe in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the
same conditions as compensation payable on the basis of other service.

Valid Claim. — To obtain benefits, an individual must file a valid claim for unemployment benefits, register for work, and have a weekly benefit amount calculated pursuant to G.S. 96-14.2(a) that equals or exceeds fifteen dollars ($15.00). An individual
must serve a one-week waiting period for each claim filed, except no waiting period applies under this subsection to a claim for unemployment due directly to a disaster covered by a federal disaster declaration. A valid claim is
one that meets the employment and wage standards in this subsection for the individual’s base period. A valid claim for a second benefit year is one that meets the employment and wage standards in this subsection since the beginning
date of the prior benefit year and before the date the new benefit claim is filed:

Employment. — The individual has been paid wages in at least two quarters of the individual’s base period.

Wages. — The individual has been paid wages totaling at least six times the average weekly insured wage during the individual’s base period. If an individual lacks sufficient base period wages, then the wage standard for that individual is determined
using the last four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of the individual’s benefit year. This alternative base period may not be used by an individual in making a claim for benefits in the next
benefit year.

Qualification Determination. — An individual’s qualification for benefits is determined based on the reason for separation from employment from the individual’s bona fide employer. The individual’s bona fide employer is the most recent employer for whom
the individual began employment for an indefinite duration or a duration of more than 30 consecutive calendar days, regardless of whether work was performed on all of those days. An individual who is disqualified has no right to
benefits. An individual who is disqualified may have the disqualification removed if the individual files a valid claim based on employment with a bona fide employer that employed the individual subsequent to the employment that
resulted in disqualification. An individual who had a prior disqualification removed may be determined to be disqualified based on the reason for separation from employment from the individual’s most recent bona fide employer,
and the individual must be otherwise eligible for benefits.

Eligibility for Benefits. — The Division must calculate a weekly benefit amount and determine the duration of benefits for an individual who files a valid claim and qualifies for benefits. To receive the weekly benefit amount, the Division must find
that the individual meets the work search eligibility requirements for each week of the benefit period. An individual who fails to meet the work search requirements for a given week is ineligible to receive a benefit until the
condition causing the ineligibility ceases to exist.

Federal Restrictions. — Benefits are not payable for services performed by the following individuals, to the maximum extent allowed by section 3304 of the Code:

Instructional, research, or principal administrative employees of educational institutions.

Employees who provide services in any other capacity for an educational institution.

Individuals who performed services described in either subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency. The term “educational service agency” has the same meaning as defined
in section 3304 of the Code.

Professional athletes.

Aliens.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, ss. 12, 19; 2013-391, s. 3; 2015-238, s. 2.10(a); 2017-8, s. 1(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-224, s. 12, effective June 27, 2013, added a new subdivision (e)(2), and redesignated former subdivisions (e)(2) and (e)(3) as present subdivisions (e)(3) and (e)(4).

Session Laws 2013-391, s. 3, effective July 1, 2013, added the second sentence in subsection (a); added the last two sentences in subsection (c); substituted “maximum extent allowed” for “extent prohibited” in the introductory language of subsection (e);
added “Employees who provide” in subdivision (e)(2); added subdivision (e)(3); and redesignated former subdivisions (e)(3) and (e)(4) as present subdivisions (e)(4) and (e)(5), respectively. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-238, s. 2.10(a), effective September 10, 2015, substituted “benefits, register for work, and have a weekly benefit amount calculated pursuant to G.S. 96-14.2(a) that equals or exceeds fifteen dollars ($15.00)” for “benefits and register
for work” in the first sentence of subsection (b). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2017-8, s. 1(c), effective October 1, 2016, inserted “except no waiting period applies under this subsection to a claim for unemployment due directly to a disaster covered by a federal disaster declaration” in the second sentence of subsection
(b).

§ 96-14.2.
Weekly benefit amount.

Weekly Benefit Amount. — The weekly benefit amount for an individual who is totally unemployed is an amount equal to the wages paid to the individual in the last two completed quarters of the individual’s base period divided by 52 and rounded to the
next lower whole dollar. If this amount is less than fifteen dollars ($15.00), the individual is not eligible for benefits. The weekly benefit amount may not exceed three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00).

Partial Weekly Benefit Amount. — The weekly benefit amount for an individual who is partially unemployed or part-totally employed is the amount the individual would receive under subsection (a) of this section if the individual were totally unemployed,
reduced by the amount of any wages earned by the individual in the benefit week in excess of twenty percent (20%) of the benefit amount applicable to total unemployment. If the amount so calculated is not a whole dollar, the amount
must be rounded to the next lower whole dollar. Payments received by an individual under a supplemental benefit plan do not affect the computation of the individual’s partial weekly benefit.

Retirement Reduction. — The amount of benefits payable to an individual must be reduced as provided in section 3304(a)(15) of the Code. This subsection does not apply to social security retirement benefits.

Income Tax Withholding. — An individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted and withheld from the individual’s unemployment benefits in the amount specified in section 3402 of the Code. An individual may elect to have State income tax deducted
and withheld from the individual’s unemployment benefits in an amount determined by the individual. The individual may change a previously elected withholding status. The amounts deducted and withheld from unemployment benefits
remain in the Unemployment Insurance Fund until transferred to the appropriate taxing authority as a payment of income tax. The Division must advise an individual in writing at the time the individual files a claim for unemployment
benefits that the benefits paid are subject to federal and State income tax, that requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments, and that the individual may elect to have the amounts withheld.

COVID-19 Increased Benefit Amount. — The weekly benefit amount calculated under this section shall be increased by fifty dollars ($50.00). The increased benefit amount is payable for weeks beginning on or after September 5, 2020. The increased benefit
amount expires and will not be paid for weeks (i) beginning on or after December 26, 2020, or (ii) immediately following the week that fully expends the amount allocated by the General Assembly for this purpose under Section 3.3(75)
of S.L. 2020-4, as amended by House Bill 1105, 2019 Regular Session, whichever occurs first.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, s. 19; 2013-391, s. 4; 2020-97, s. 1.6A; 2021-5, s. 3; 2021-16, s. 2.1.

§ 96-14.3.
Duration of benefits.

Duration. —

The number of weeks an individual is allowed to receive unemployment benefits depends on the seasonal adjusted statewide unemployment rate that applies to the six-month base period in which the claim is filed. One six-month base period begins on January
1 and one six-month base period begins on July 1. For the base period that begins January 1, the average of the seasonal adjusted unemployment rates for the State for the preceding months of July, August, and September applies.
For the base period that begins July 1, the average of the seasonal adjusted unemployment rates for the State for the preceding months of January, February, and March applies. The Division must use the most recent seasonal
adjusted unemployment rate determined by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, and not the rate as revised in the annual benchmark.

Click to view

Total Benefits. — The total benefits paid to an individual equals the individual’s weekly benefit amount allowed under

G.S. 96-14.2

multiplied by the number of weeks allowed under subsection (a) of this section.

Seasonal Adjusted Unemployment Rate Number of Weeks Less than or equal to 5.5% 12 Greater than 5.5% up to 6% 13 Greater than 6% up to 6.5% 14 Greater than 6.5% up to 7% 15 Greater than 7% up to 7.5% 16 Greater than 7.5% up to 8% 17 Greater than 8% up
to 8.5% 18 Greater than 8.5% up to 9% 19 Greater than 9% 20

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, ss. 13, 19; 2015-238, s. 2.8(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-224, s. 13, effective June 27, 2013, in the third sentence, inserted “average of the” and substituted “rates” for “rate” and “months of July, August, and September” for “month of October”; and in the fourth sentence, added “average of
the” and substituted “rates‘ for “rate” and “months of January, February, and March” for “month of April.‘

Session Laws 2015-238, s. 2.8(b), effective July 1, 2015, in the catchline substituted “Duration of benefits” for “Minimum and maximum duration”; added subsection (a) designation, substituted “Duration. — The number” for “The minimum and maximum number”,
deleted the last sentence which read: “The number of weeks allowed for an individual is determined in accordance with

G.S. 96-14.4

.”; deleted the column for “Minimum Number of Weeks” and deleted “Maximum” from the present second column; and added subsection (b).

§ 96-14.4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-238, s. 2.8(a), effective July 1, 2015.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, s. 19; repealed by 2015-238, s. 2.8(a), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 96-14.5.
Disqualification for good cause not attributable to the employer.

Determination. — The Division must determine the reason for an individual’s separation from work. An individual does not have a right to benefits and is disqualified from receiving benefits if the Division determines that the individual left work for
a reason other than good cause attributable to the employer. When an individual leaves work, the burden of showing good cause attributable to the employer rests on the individual and the burden may not be shifted to the employer.

Reduced Work Hours. — When an individual leaves work due solely to a unilateral and permanent reduction in work hours of more than fifty percent (50%) of the customary scheduled full-time work hours in the establishment, plant, or industry in which the
individual was employed, the leaving is presumed to be good cause attributable to the employer. The employer may rebut the presumption if the reduction is temporary or was occasioned by malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance
on the part of the individual.

Reduced Rate of Pay. — When an individual leaves work due solely to a unilateral and permanent reduction in the individual’s rate of pay of more than fifteen percent (15%), the leaving is presumed to be good cause attributable to the employer. The employer
may rebut the presumption if the reduction is temporary or was occasioned by malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance on the part of the individual.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, s. 19.

§ 96-14.6.
Disqualification for misconduct.

Disqualification. — An individual who the Division determines is unemployed for misconduct connected with the work is disqualified for benefits. The period of disqualification begins with the first day of the first week the individual files a claim for
benefits after the misconduct occurs.

Misconduct. — Misconduct connected with the work is either of the following:

Conduct evincing a willful or wanton disregard of the employer’s interest as is found in deliberate violation or disregard of standards of behavior that the employer has the right to expect of an employee or has explained orally or in writing to an employee.

Conduct evincing carelessness or negligence of such degree or recurrence as to manifest an intentional and substantial disregard of the employer’s interests or of the employee’s duties and obligations to the employer.

Examples. — The following examples are prima facie evidence of misconduct that may be rebutted by the individual making a claim for benefits:

Violation of the employer’s written alcohol or illegal drug policy.

Reporting to work significantly impaired by alcohol or illegal drugs.

Consumption of alcohol or illegal drugs on the employer’s premises.

Conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction for manufacturing, selling, or distributing a controlled substance punishable under G.S. 90-95(a)(1) or G.S. 90-95(a)(2) if the offense is related to or connected with an employee’s work for the employer
or is in violation of a reasonable work rule or policy.

Termination or suspension from employment after arrest or conviction for an offense involving violence, sex crimes, or illegal drugs if the offense is related to or connected with the employee’s work for an employer or is in violation of a reasonable
work rule or policy.

Any physical violence whatsoever related to the employee’s work for an employer, including physical violence directed at supervisors, subordinates, coworkers, vendors, customers, or the general public.

Inappropriate comments or behavior toward supervisors, subordinates, coworkers, vendors, customers, or to the general public relating to any federally protected characteristic that creates a hostile work environment.

Theft in connection with the employment.

Forging or falsifying any document or data related to employment, including a previously submitted application for employment.

Violation of an employer’s written absenteeism policy.

Refusal to perform reasonably assigned work tasks or failure to adequately perform employment duties as evidenced by no fewer than three written reprimands in the 12 months immediately preceding the employee’s termination.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, s. 19.

§ 96-14.7.
Other reasons to be disqualified from receiving benefits.

Failure to Supply Necessary License. — An individual is disqualified for benefits if the Division determines that the individual is unemployed for failure to possess a license, certificate, permit, bond, or surety that is necessary for the performance
of the individual’s employment if it was the individual’s responsibility to supply the necessary documents and the individual’s inability to do so was within the individual’s control. The period of disqualification begins with
the first day of the first week the individual files a claim for benefits after the individual’s failure occurs.

Labor Dispute. — An individual is disqualified for benefits if the Division determines the individual’s total or partial unemployment is caused by a labor dispute in active progress at the factory, establishment, or other premises at which the individual
is or was last employed or by a labor dispute at another place within this State that is owned or operated by the employer that owns or operates the factory, establishment, or other premises at which the individual is or was last
employed and that supplies materials or services necessary to the continued and usual operation of the premises at which the individual is or was last employed. An individual disqualified under the provisions of this subsection
continues to be disqualified after the labor dispute has ceased to be in active progress for the period of time that is reasonably necessary and required to physically resume operations in the method of operating in use at the
plant, factory, or establishment.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, s. 19.

§ 96-14.8.
Military spouse relocation and domestic violence are good causes for leaving.

An individual is not disqualified for benefits for leaving work for one of the reasons listed in this section. Benefits paid on the basis of this section are not chargeable to the employer’s account:

Military spouse relocation. — Leaving work to accompany the individual’s spouse to a new place of residence because the spouse has been reassigned from one military assignment to another.

Domestic violence. — Leaving work for reasons of domestic violence if the individual reasonably believes that the individual’s continued employment would jeopardize the safety of the individual or of any member of the individual’s immediate family. For
purposes of this subdivision, an individual is a victim of domestic violence if one or more of the following applies:

The individual has been adjudged an aggrieved party as set forth by Chapter 50B of the General Statutes.

There is evidence of domestic violence, sexual offense, or stalking. Evidence of domestic violence, sexual offense, or stalking may include any one or more of the following:

Law enforcement, court, or federal agency records or files.

Documentation from a domestic violence or sexual assault program if the individual is alleged to be a victim of domestic violence or sexual assault.

Documentation from a religious, medical, or other professional from whom the individual has sought assistance in dealing with the alleged domestic violence, sexual abuse, or stalking.

The individual has been granted program participant status pursuant to

G.S. 15C-4

as the result of domestic violence committed upon the individual or upon a minor child with or in the custody of the individual by another individual who has or has had a familial relationship with the
individual or minor child.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, s. 19.

§ 96-14.9.
Weekly certification.

Requirements. — An individual’s eligibility for a weekly benefit amount is determined on a week-to-week basis. An individual must meet all of the requirements of this section for each weekly benefit period. An individual who fails to meet one or more
of the requirements is ineligible to receive benefits until the condition causing the ineligibility ceases to exist:

File a claim for benefits.

Report as requested by the Division and present valid photo identification meeting the requirements of subsection (k) of this section.

Meet the work search requirements of subsection (b) of this section.

Work Search Requirements. — The Division must find that the individual meets all of the following work search requirements:

The individual is able to work.

The individual is available to work.

The individual is actively seeking work.

The individual accepts suitable work when offered.

Able to Work. — An individual is not able to work during any week that the individual is receiving or is applying for benefits under any other state or federal law based on the individual’s temporary total or permanent total disability.

Available to Work. — An individual is not available to work during any week that one or more of the following applies:

The individual tests positive for a controlled substance. An individual tests positive for a controlled substance if all of the conditions of this subdivision apply. An employer must report an individual’s positive test for a controlled substance to the
Division:

The test is a controlled substance examination administered under Article 20 of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes.

The test is required as a condition of hire for a job.

The job would be suitable work for the individual.

The individual is incarcerated or has received notice to report to or is otherwise detained in a state or federal jail or penal institution. This subdivision does not apply to an individual who is incarcerated solely on a weekend in a county jail and
who is otherwise available for work.

The individual is an alien and is not in satisfactory immigration status under the laws administered by the United States Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service.

The individual is on disciplinary suspension for 30 or fewer days based on acts or omissions that constitute fault on the part of the employee and are connected with the work.

Actively Seeking Work. — The Division’s determination of whether an individual is actively seeking work is based upon the following:

The individual is registered for employment services, as required by the Division.

The individual has engaged in an active search for employment that is appropriate in light of the employment available in the labor market and the individual’s skills and capabilities.

The individual has made at least three job contacts with potential employers during the week. An individual may satisfy one of the weekly job contacts by attending a reemployment activity offered by a local career center. The Division shall verify the
suitability of the activity for the credit and the claimant’s attendance at the activity.

The individual has maintained a record of the individual’s work search efforts. The record must include the potential employers contacted, the method of contact, and the date contacted. The individual must provide the record to the Division upon request.

Suitable Work. — The Division’s determination of whether an employment offer is suitable must vary based upon the individual’s length of unemployment as follows:

During the first 10 weeks of a benefit period, the Division may consider all of the following:

The degree of risk involved to the individual’s health, safety, and morals.

The individual’s physical fitness and prior training and experience.

The individual’s prospects for securing local work in the individual’s customary occupation.

The distance of the available work from the individual’s residence.

The individual’s prior earnings.

During the remaining weeks of a benefit period, the Division must consider any employment offer paying one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the individual’s weekly benefit amount to be suitable work.

Job Attachment. — An individual who is partially unemployed and for whom the employer has filed an attached claim for benefits has satisfied the work search requirements for any given week in the benefit period associated with the attached claim if the
Division determines the individual is available for work with the employer that filed the attached claim.

Job Training. — An individual who is otherwise eligible may not be denied benefits for any week because of the application to any such week of requirements relating to availability for work, active search for work, or refusal to accept work if the individual
is attending a training program approved by the Division.

Federal Labor Standards. — An otherwise eligible individual may not be denied benefits for a given week if the Division determines the individual refused to accept new work for one or more of the following reasons:

The position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute.

The remuneration, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are substantially less favorable to the individual than those prevailing for similar work in the locality.

The individual would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization as a condition of employment.

Trade Act of 1974. — An otherwise eligible individual may not be denied benefits for any week because the individual is in training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974, nor may the individual be denied benefits by reason of leaving
work to enter such training, provided the work left is not suitable employment, or because of the application to any such week in training of provisions in this law or of any applicable federal unemployment compensation law, relating
to availability for work, active search for work, or refusal to accept work. For purposes of this subsection, the term “suitable employment” means with respect to an individual, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level
than the individual’s past adversely affected employment, as defined for purposes of the Trade Act of 1974, and wages for such work at not less than eighty percent (80%) of the individual’s average weekly wage as determined for
the purposes of the Trade Act of 1974.

Photo Identification. — The individual must present the Division one of the following documents bearing the individual’s photograph:

A drivers license, learner’s permit, provisional license, or nonoperator’s identification card issued by North Carolina, another state, the District of Columbia, United States territory, or United States commonwealth.

A United States passport.

A United States military identification card.

A Veterans Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

A tribal enrollment card issued by a federally recognized tribe.

Any other document that the Division determines adequately identifies the individual and that is issued by the United States, any state, the District of Columbia, United States territory, or United States commonwealth.

A traveler card issued by the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, such as the NEXUS SENTRI and FAST CARDS.

Federal Disaster Declaration. — An individual who is unemployed due directly to a disaster covered by a federal disaster declaration has satisfied the work search requirements for any given week in the benefit period unless the Division requires the
individual to conduct a work search.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, ss. 14, 19; 2013-391, s. 5; 2015-238, ss. 2.2(a), 2.6; 2017-8, s. 1(d); 2018-94, s. 3(a); 2020-3, s. 1.3(a).

§ 96-14.10.
Disciplinary suspension.

The disciplinary suspension of an employee for 30 or fewer consecutive calendar days does not constitute good cause for leaving work. An individual who is on suspension is not available for work and is not eligible for benefits for any week during any
part of the disciplinary suspension. If the disciplinary suspension exceeds 30 days, the individual is considered to have been discharged from work because of the acts or omissions that caused the suspension and the issue is whether
the discharge was for disqualifying reasons. During the period of suspension of 30 or fewer days, the individual is considered to be attached to the employer’s payroll, and the issue of separation from work is held in abeyance until
a claim is filed for a week to which this section does not apply.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, ss. 15, 19.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-224, s. 15, effective June 27, 2013, substituted “of 30 or fewer” for “up to 30” in the last sentence.

§ 96-14.11.
Disqualification for the remaining weeks of the benefit period.

Duration. — An individual may be disqualified from receiving benefits for the remaining weeks of the claim’s duration if one or more subsections of this section apply. The period of disqualification under this section begins with the first day of the
first week after the disqualifying act occurs.

Suitable Work. — An individual is disqualified for any remaining benefits if the Division determines that the individual has failed, without good cause, to do one or more of the following:

Apply for available suitable work when so directed by the employment office of the Division.

Accept suitable work when offered.

Return to the individual’s customary self-employment when so directed by the Division.

Recall After Layoff. — An individual is disqualified for any remaining benefits if it is determined by the Division that the individual is unemployed because the individual, without good cause attributable to the employer and after receiving notice from
the employer, refused to return to work for an employer under one or more of the following circumstances:

The individual was recalled within four weeks after a layoff. As used in this subdivision, the term “layoff” means a temporary separation from work due to no work available for the individual at the time of separation from work and the individual is retained
on the employer’s payroll and is a continuing employee subject to recall by the employer.

The individual was recalled in a week in which the work search requirements were satisfied under

G.S. 96-14.9(g)

due to job attachment.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, ss. 19, 20(e); 2013-391, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-224, s. 20(e), effective June 27, 2013, substituted “G.S. 96-14.9(g)” for “G.S. 96-14.7(g)” in subdivision (c)(2).

Session Laws 2013-391, s. 6, effective July 1, 2013, deleted “at the time a claim is filed” following “individual is” in subsection (c). For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 96-14.12.
Limitations on company officers and spouses.

Disqualification for Benefits. — An individual is disqualified for benefits if the Division determines either of the following:

The individual is customarily self-employed and can reasonably return to self-employment.

The individual or the individual’s spouse is unemployed because the individual’s ownership share of the employer was voluntarily sold and, at the time of the sale, one or more of the following applied:

The employer was a corporation and the individual held five percent (5%) or more of the outstanding shares of the voting stock of the corporation.

The employer was a partnership, limited or general, and the individual was a limited or general partner.

The employer was a limited liability company and the individual was a member.

The employer was a proprietorship, and the individual was the proprietor.

Duration of Benefits. — This subsection applies to an individual and the spouse of an individual who is unemployed based on services performed for a corporation in which the individual held five percent (5%) or more of the outstanding shares of the voting
stock of the corporation. The maximum number of weeks an individual or an individual’s spouse may receive benefits is six weeks.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, s. 19; 2015-238, s. 2.8(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-238, s. 2.8(c), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “six weeks” for “limited to the lesser of six weeks or the applicable weeks determined under

G.S. 96-14.4

” at the end of the second sentence of subsection (b).

§ 96-14.13.
Limitation on benefits due to lump sum payments.

An individual is disqualified from receiving benefits for any week for which the individual receives any sum from the employer pursuant to an order of a court, the National Labor Relations Board, or another adjudicative agency or by private agreement,
consent, or arbitration for loss of pay by reason of discharge. When the employer pays a lump sum that covers a period of more than one week, the amount paid is allocated to the weeks in the period on a pro rata basis as determined
by the Division. If the amount prorated to a week would, if it had been earned by the individual during that week of unemployment, have resulted in a reduced benefit payment as provided in

G.S. 96-14.2

, the individual is entitled to receive the reduced payment if the individual is otherwise eligible for benefits.

Benefits paid for weeks of unemployment for which back pay awards or other similar compensation are made constitutes an overpayment of benefits. The employer must deduct the overpayment from the award prior to payment to the employee and must send the
overpayment to the Division within five days of the payment for application against the overpayment. Overpayments not remitted to the Division are subject to the same collection procedures as contributions. The removal of charges made
against the employer’s account as a result of the previously paid benefits applies to the calendar year in which the Division receives the overpayment.

History.
2013-2, s. 5; 2013-224, s. 19.